Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.180

Office to be declared vacant on conviction.

The board of county commissioners of any county in this state, upon receiving a certified copy of the record of conviction of any officer for receiving illegal fees, or where the officer collects fees and fails to account for the same, upon proof thereof must declare his or her office vacant and appoint his or her successor.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4022; 1963 c 4 s 36.18.180. Prior: 1890 p 315 s 42; RRS s 4224.]